Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.365

Sexual assault—Nurse examiner leader pilot program—Report. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

(1) The Washington State University college of nursing shall establish a regional sexual assault nurse examiner leader pilot program. Regional lead sexual assault nurse examiners participating in the program shall:

(a) Establish the number of active sexual assault nurse examiners in their communities;

(b) Report on the educational needs of their communities;

(c) Produce recommendations on how to best increase the number of sexual assault nurse examiners in their communities; and

(d) Develop community-based action plans for sexual assault nurse examiner recruitment.

(2) The Washington State University college of nursing shall:

(a) Develop and train lead sexual assault nurse examiners; and

(b) Assist in the development of support mechanisms and role requirements for regional lead sexual assault nurse examiners.

(3) The Washington State University college of nursing shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 annual reports on the impact of the pilot program with a final report due no later than January 1, 2026.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[ 2022 c 118 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 118: See note following RCW 28B.30.360.